Utah statutes.
41-22-1.   Policy declaration.

It is the policy of this state to promote safety and protection for persons, property, and the environment connected with the use, operation, and equipment of off-highway vehicles, to promote uniformity of laws, to adopt and pursue a safety education program, and to develop trails and other facilities for the use of these vehicles.



Amended by Chapter 163, 1987 General Session

